Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 7. Fish Packers and Processors.

Sec. 34.35.320.
Packer’s and processor’s lien.

A person who contributes to the preparation of fish or aquatic animals for food, fish, meal, fertilizer, oil, or other article of commerce by furnishing material or labor for it has a lien for the value of the labor and material upon (1) the product or output of the cannery, saltery, or other plant or establishment, for which material or labor was furnished; and (2) the plant or establishment itself, including the houses, wharves, machinery, and equipment of the plant or establishment, for the value of labor and material.

This provision may not be construed to give a lien to (1) an officer of a corporation or of an association for labor or material furnished by the officer to the corporation or association; (2) a superintendent, manager, foreman, contractor, or subcontractor in charge of a cannery, saltery, or other plant or establishment for labor or material that the person has furnished to the plant or establishment; or (3) the owner or lessor of a plant or the equipment of the plant for the use or rental of the plant or equipment.

History.

(§ 26-6-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.325.
Time limit.

The person performing the service or doing the work or furnishing the material mentioned in AS

34.35.320

is only entitled to a lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

for service, work, or material furnished for the six months, or a shorter period, preceding the recording of a claim under AS

34.35.330

.

History.

(§ 26-6-2 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.330.
Lien claim.

A person who claims the benefit of AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

shall, within 90 days after the completion of the work or the furnishing of material mentioned in AS

34.35.320

, record a claim of lien in the recorder’s office of the recording district where

the product or output of the plant, cannery, saltery, or other establishment for which the material or labor is furnished is located; or

the cannery, saltery, or other plant or establishment on which the lien is claimed is located.

The claim of lien must contain a statement of

the claimant’s demand and the amount of the demand after deducting credits and offsets;

the name of the person by whom the claimant is employed or at whose request the material is furnished;

the terms and conditions of the contract of employment or under which the material was furnished;

a description of the property sufficient for identification on which the lien is claimed; and

the name of the owner or reputed owner thereof.

The lien claim shall be verified by the oath of the lien claimant or someone on behalf of the lien claimant who has knowledge of the facts.

If there is no express contract of employment or for furnishing the material the claim shall state the reasonable value of the work, labor, or material.

History.

(§ 26-6-3 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.335.
Extent of lien.

A lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

binds all the right, title, and interest of the person at whose instance or request or for whom the work is performed or material furnished, to the full extent of the interest that the person has at the commencement of the work or at the time the material is furnished, for which the lien is claimed, or subsequently acquired up to the time of foreclosure of the lien, in (1) all of the product or output of the cannery, saltery, or other plant or establishment for which the material or work was furnished; and (2) the plant or establishment itself, including the houses, wharves, machinery, and equipment.

History.

(§ 26-6-4 ACLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

Priority as between mechanic's lien and purchase-money mortgage. 73 ALR2d 1407.

Priority between mechanics' liens and advances made under previously executed mortgage. 80 ALR2d 179.

Sec. 34.35.340.
Priority.

A lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

is preferred, prior, and superior to a mortgage, attachment, claim, or demand made or recorded in the recorder’s office of the recording district where the property subject to the lien is located after

the commencement of the work for which the lien is claimed;

the material is furnished for which the lien is claimed.

A sale, transfer, mortgage, assignment, or attachment recorded after the commencement of the work or furnishing of the material does not postpone the lien. A lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

is not prior or paramount to a valid prior lien for labor performed or material furnished in the construction, alteration, or repair of the houses, wharves, or other shore property.

History.

(§ 26-6-4 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.345.
Duration of lien.

A lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

does not bind the property for more than six months after the lien is recorded, unless suit is brought before the proper court within that time to enforce the lien or if credit is given, within six months after the expiration of the credit.

A lien does not continue in force for more than one year from the cessation of the work or the furnishing of the material, by an agreement to give credit.

History.

(§ 26-6-5 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.350.
Commissioner of public safety as receiver.

The commissioner of public safety or a peace officer designated by the commissioner is the receiver, when one is appointed, and the superior court upon a showing made may appoint the receiver without notice.

The receiver is entitled to the fees that seem just to the court and the receiver shall account for the fees collected under this subsection in the same manner other fees collected in an official capacity are accounted for.

When property subject to a lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

is in the custody or about to be taken into the custody of the receiver, a person who claims an interest in the property may deposit with the clerk of the court in which the action is pending a sum of money equal to the value of the property, but not greater than the amount of the claims sued upon together with $100 to cover costs and interest, unless the court makes an order fixing a different amount to cover costs and interest, and may demand and receive the possession and custody of the property from the receiver immediately.

History.

(§ 26-6-6 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.355.
Bona fide purchasers.

The court shall conclusively presume that a party who purchases property on which a lien is claimed, within the time allowed for the filing of the lien, is not an innocent purchaser for value and is not a bona fide owner of the property subject to the lien, unless it appears that

the purchaser paid the reasonable value of the property; and

the purchase price for the property is applied to the payment of the bona fide claimants who are entitled to liens upon the property under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

.

History.

(§ 26-6-7 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.360.
Enforcement against whole or part of property.

A person who brings a suit to enforce the lien, or a person having a lien, who is made a party to the action, may demand that the lien be enforced against the whole or a part of the property upon which the person performs labor or for which the person furnishes material.

Where there are several lien claims against the same property or partly against the same property and partly against separate property, and it appears to the court that the property that may legally be held for the claims is insufficient to satisfy all the claims, the court shall, as nearly as practicable, determine what particular item of the property subject to the lien is the product in whole or in part of the labor or material furnished by each of the several claimants and for which each claims a lien, and shall give preference accordingly.

History.

(§ 26-6-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.365.
Property to be sold before judgment.

When it appears, during the term or in vacation, that the property is liable to loss or destruction, the court shall order it sold, free of the lien, by a peace officer, in the manner provided for the sale of personal property under execution, before judgment is rendered.
The proceeds of sale shall be paid into court to be applied as directed in the judgment.

History.

(§ 26-6-9 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.370.
Liability for injuring property or destroying identity.

A person who eloigns, injures, or destroys, or who makes difficult, uncertain, or impossible the identification of a property on which there is a lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

, without the written consent of the lienholder, is liable to the lienholder for the damages to the amount secured by the lien together with costs and charges of drawing and recording the lien and reasonable attorney fees for the foreclosure of the lien.

If these facts are shown to the court in the suit to enforce the lien, the court shall enter a personal judgment for the amount of the damages in the action against the person, if the person is a party to the action, or the damages may be recovered in a civil action against the person.

History.

(§ 26-6-10 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.375.
Release upon filing bond.

After a lien attaches upon property mentioned in AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

, the owner of the property or a person on behalf of the owner may file with the clerk of the superior court in the judicial district in which the property is located, a bond (1) in a sum double the amount claimed in the lien notice; (2) executed by two sureties who have the qualifications of bail upon arrest; (3) to be approved by the clerk of the court; (4) running to the claimant in the lien notice; and (5) conditioned for the payment of all damages, costs, charges, and disbursements recovered by the lien claimant against the owner, or found to be a lien upon or against the property described in the lien notice.

The clerk shall issue to the owner a certificate stating that the bond is substituted in place of the property and that the lien on the property is released and discharged. A marginal entry of the release and substitution of bond shall be made in the lien docket in the office of the recorder where the lien statement is recorded.

If the lien claimant establishes the lien by a suit to enforce it, the lien claimant is entitled to judgment against the principal and sureties on the bond.

Nothing in this section deprives a person of a defense that the person would have had if the bond had not been given. The filing of the bond does not affect the time within which the foreclosure suit must be started.

History.

(§ 26-6-11 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.380.
Misdemeanor to remove lien property from state.

A person who removes or has removed from the state fish, fish products, or the products of an aquatic animal, or fishing appliances, upon which there is a lien or right of lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

, unless a bond under AS

34.35.375

is filed, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $2,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 26-6-12 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.385.
Embezzlement of lien property.

A person who sells or otherwise disposes of fish or the products of fish or aquatic animals or other property upon which there is a lien under AS

34.35.320

—

34.35.390

is a trustee for the lien claimant of the consideration received or promised to be paid for the property and shall account to the lien claimant for it.

If it appears, in a prosecution under this section, that the defendant has paid all claims of lien upon the property removed from the state or that the full value of the property has been distributed among the persons entitled to the lien, the defendant shall be discharged and further proceedings may not be brought against the defendant.

A trustee who refuses or fails to account for the trust fund, or refuses or fails to apply it in payment of the lien claim is guilty of embezzlement, and upon conviction is punishable accordingly.

History.

(§ 26-6-13 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.390.
Written statements to employees.

When a person employs another to work at a cannery, saltery, or other plant or establishment in this state for the catching or preparation of fish or aquatic animals for food, fish meal, fertilizer, oil, or other articles of commerce, and the plant or establishment, at the time of employment, is subject to a lien, mortgage, encumbrance, or the provisions of a transfer or conditional sale, or the employer is not the owner of the plant or establishment, or of the boats or fishing gear connected with it, the employer shall furnish to each employee at the time of employment, or in any event, not later than the time the employee is brought within the state boundaries, a written statement showing

the name of the owner of the plant or establishment at or in connection with which the employee is to work;

a general description of the plant or establishment as to buildings, boats, and other gear and material;

whether any of the property is subject to a lien, mortgage, encumbrance, assignment, or conditional sale and, if so, the amount of it.

In a prosecution under this section, the defendant may show in defense that the claims for labor of the employees to whom the statements were not furnished have been paid in full. A defendant who does so shall be discharged.

Failure to furnish a statement required by this section is a misdemeanor and a person who violates this section is punishable by a fine of not more than $2,000 or by imprisonment for not more than six months or by both.

History.

(§ 26-6-14 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly (c) and subsection (c) was formerly (b); relettered in 2002.